Utah statutes.
31A-2-309.   Service of process through state officer.

(1)  The commissioner, or the lieutenant governor when the subject proceeding is brought by the state, is the agent for receipt of service of a summons, notice, order, pleading, or other legal process relating to a Utah court or administrative agency upon the following:

(a)  an insurer authorized to do business in this state, while authorized to do business in this state, and thereafter in a proceeding arising from or related to a transaction having a connection with this state;

(b)  a surplus lines insurer for a proceeding arising out of a contract of insurance that is subject to the surplus lines law, or out of a certificate, cover note, or other confirmation of that type of insurance;

(c)  an unauthorized insurer or other person assisting an unauthorized insurer under Subsection 31A-15-102(1) by doing an act specified in Subsection 31A-15-102(2), for a proceeding arising out of a transaction that is subject to the unauthorized insurance law;

(d)  a nonresident producer, consultant, adjuster, or third party administrator, while authorized to do business in this state, and thereafter in a proceeding arising from or related to a transaction having a connection with this state; and

(e)  a reinsurer submitting to the commissioner's jurisdiction under Subsection 31A-17-404(8).

(2)  The following is considered to have irrevocably appointed the commissioner and lieutenant governor as that person's agents in accordance with Subsection (1):

(a)  a licensed insurer by applying for and receiving a certificate of authority;

(b)  a surplus lines insurer by entering into a contract subject to the surplus lines law;

(c)  an unauthorized insurer by doing in this state an act prohibited by Section 31A-15-103; and

(d)  a nonresident producer, consultant, adjuster, and third party administrator.

(3)  The commissioner and lieutenant governor are also agents for an executor, administrator, personal representative, receiver, trustee, or other successor in interest of a person specified under Subsection (1).

(4)  A litigant serving process on the commissioner or lieutenant governor under this section shall pay the fee applicable under Section 31A-3-103.

(5)  The right to substituted service under this section does not limit the right to serve a summons, notice, order, pleading, demand, or other process upon a person in another manner provided by law.



Amended by Chapter 257, 2008 General Session

